Texas statutes.
NATURAL RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC DOMAIN

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 12. RED RIVER BOUNDARY COMPACT; RED RIVER BOUNDARY COMMISSION

SUBCHAPTER A. RED RIVER BOUNDARY COMPACT

Sec. 12.001. ADOPTION OF COMPACT. This state enacts the Red River Boundary Compact into law and enters into the compact with the State of Oklahoma if that state legally joins in the compact in substantially the form provided by Section 12.002.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999.

Sec. 12.002. TEXT OF COMPACT. The Red River Boundary Compact reads as follows:

RED RIVER BOUNDARY COMPACT

ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

(a) The states of Texas and Oklahoma recognize that:

(1) there are actual and potential disputes, controversies, criminal proceedings, and litigation arising, or that may arise, out of the location of the boundary line between the states along the Red River;

(2) the south bank of the Red River is the boundary between the states along the Red River;

(3) the boundary between the states changes as a result of the natural action of the river and, because of those changes and the nature of the land, the south bank of the river is often not readily or easily identified;

(4) while the south bank, at any given time, may be located through expensive and time-consuming survey techniques, such surveys can, at best, identify the south bank only as it exists at the time of the survey;

(5) locating the south bank through survey techniques is of minimal aid when agencies of the party states must locate the state boundary line for law enforcement, administrative, and taxation purposes; and

(6) the interests of the party states are better served by establishing the boundary between the states through use of a readily identifiable natural landmark than through use of an artificial survey line.

(b) It is the principal purpose of the party states in entering into this compact to establish an identifiable boundary between the states of Texas and Oklahoma along the Red River as of the effective date of this compact without interfering with or otherwise affecting private property rights or title to property. In addition, this compact serves the compelling purposes of:

(1) creation of a friendly and harmonious interstate relationship;

(2) avoidance of multiple exercise of sovereignty and jurisdiction, including matters of taxation, judicial and police powers, and exercise of administrative authority;

(3) avoidance of lack of exercise of sovereignty and jurisdiction over any lands along the boundary;

(4) avoidance of questions of venue in civil and criminal proceedings that may arise as a result of incidents along the boundary and avoidance or minimization of future disputes and litigation;

(5) promotion of economic and political stability; and

(6) placement of the boundary at a location that can be visually identified or located without the necessity of a current survey and that is close to the historical boundary location.

ARTICLE II. ESTABLISHMENT OF BOUNDARY

(a) In this article:

(1) "Vegetation" means trees, shrubs, grasses, and other plant species that substantially cover the ground. Whether the vegetation substantially covers the ground is determined by reference to the density of the coverage of the ground by trees, shrubs, grasses, and other plant species in the area adjacent to the relevant portion of the riverbed.

(2) "Vegetation line" means the visually identifiable continuous line of vegetation that is adjacent to that portion of the riverbed kept practically bare of vegetation by the natural flow of the river and is continuous with the vegetation beyond the riverbed. Stray vegetation, patches of vegetation, or islands of vegetation within the riverbed that do not form such a line are not considered part of the vegetation line. Where the riverbed is entered by the inflow of another watercourse or is otherwise interrupted or disturbed by a man-made event, the line constituting the boundary is an artificial line formed by extending the vegetation line above and below the other watercourse or interrupted or disturbed area to connect and cross the watercourse or area.

(b) The permanent political boundary line between the states of Texas and Oklahoma along the Red River is the vegetation line along the south bank of the Red River except for the Texoma area, where the boundary does not change. For purposes of this compact:

(1) the Texoma area extends from the east bank of Shawnee Creek (which flows into the Red River from the south approximately one-half mile below the Denison Dam) at its mouth to the upper end of the normal pool elevation of Lake Texoma (which is 617 feet); and

(2) the upper end of the normal pool elevation of Lake Texoma is along the latitude of 33 degrees 54 minutes as it crosses the watercourse at the approximate location of longitude 96 degrees 59 minutes.

(c) The party states agree that the existing boundary within the Texoma area begins at the intersection of the vegetation line on the south bank of the Red River with the east bank of Shawnee Creek. From this point, the boundary extends west along the south bank of the Red River as the bank existed immediately before the commencement of the construction of Lake Texoma. From Shawnee Creek to Denison Dam, this boundary line is within the current channel of the Red River. Within Lake Texoma, this boundary line follows the south bank of the Red River as the bank was located and marked by the United States Army Corps of Engineers before the commencement of the construction of Lake Texoma.

(d) Within one year after the date the United States Congress consents to this compact, the Commissioner of the General Land Office of Texas and a designated member of the Oklahoma Red River Boundary Commission shall:

(1) locate the boundary line within the Texoma area as described by Subsection (c), using the survey that the United States Army Corps of Engineers prepared in connection with the construction of Lake Texoma and any other surveys, historical maps, or other information that may be available;

(2) prepare a map of the boundary line; and

(3) file the map in the state library and archives of each party state and with the Oklahoma Secretary of State, after which the map will be a part of this compact.

(e) Within one year after the date the map is filed under Subsection (d)(3), the United States Army Corps of Engineers shall permanently mark the boundary line within the Texoma area as shown on the map. The United States Army Corps of Engineers shall maintain the markers annually, or more frequently if necessary.

(f) The party states may:

(1) agree to equally share the cost of monumenting and maintaining the lines demarking both the boundary within the Texoma area and the upper limit of the normal pool elevation in a manner designed to make the boundary readily identifiable to the using public; or

(2) seek funding from other sources for monumenting and maintaining the lines.

(g) Should there be a change in the watercourse of the Red River, the party states recognize the rules of accretion, erosion, and avulsion. The states agree that accretion or erosion may cause a change in the boundary between the states if it causes a change in the vegetation line. With regard to avulsion, the states agree that a change in the course of the Red River caused by an immediately perceivable natural event that changes the vegetation line will change the location of the boundary between the states.

ARTICLE III. SOVEREIGNTY

On the effective date of this compact, the party states agree that the State of Oklahoma possesses sovereignty over all lands north of the boundary line established by this compact and that the State of Texas possesses sovereignty over all lands south of the boundary line established by this compact. This compact does not change or affect in any manner the sovereignty rights of federally recognized Indian tribes over lands on either side of the boundary line established by this compact. Tribal sovereignty rights continue to be established and defined by controlling federal law.

ARTICLE IV. PENDING LITIGATION

This compact does not affect the jurisdiction of any litigation concerning the title to any of the lands bordering the Red River pending in the courts of either of the party states or the United States as of the effective date of this compact. The states intend that such litigation, if any, continue in the trial and appellate courts of the jurisdiction where pending, until the litigation is finally determined.

ARTICLE V. PUBLIC RECORDS

(a) All public records in either party state concerning any lands the sovereignty over which is changed by this compact are accepted as evidence of record title to such lands, to and including the effective date of this compact, by the courts of the other state and the federal courts.

(b) As to lands the sovereignty over which is changed by this compact, the recording officials of the counties of each party state shall accept for filing certified copies of documents of title previously filed in the other state and documents of title using legal descriptions derived from the land descriptions of the other state. The acceptance of a document for filing has no bearing on its legal effect or sufficiency. The legal sufficiency of a document's form, execution, and acknowledgments, and the document's ability to convey or otherwise affect title, are determined by the document itself and the real estate laws of the jurisdiction in which the land was located at the time the document was executed or took effect.

ARTICLE VI. TAXES

(a) Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (c), the lands the sovereignty over which is changed by this compact are, after the effective date of this compact, subject to taxation only by the state gaining sovereignty over the lands by this compact.

(b) Taxes for the year of adoption of this compact for property the jurisdiction over which is changed by this compact may be lawfully imposed only by the state in which the property was located on January 1 of the year of adoption of this compact. The taxes for the year of adoption may be levied and collected by that state or its authorized governmental subdivisions or agencies, and any liens or other rights accrued or accruing, including the right of collection, are fully recognized, except that all liens or other rights arising out of the imposition of those taxes must be claimed or asserted within five years after this compact takes effect or they are barred.

(c) The party states recognize that the boundary between the states will change from time to time as a result of the natural actions of accretion, erosion, and avulsion and agree that for years subsequent to the year of adoption of this compact, the state within which lands adjoining the boundary line are located on January 1 of each year has the right to levy and collect taxes for the entire ensuing year.

(d) All taxes currently assessed by governmental entities in each party state as to lands that border or cross the boundary line established by this compact are presumed to be correct as to acreage within the particular jurisdiction, absent competent proof to the contrary presented in writing by the property owner or owners to the appropriate taxing agencies. All such proof must be presented to the appropriate taxing agencies before May 1 of the year following the year in which this compact takes effect. In subsequent years it is presumed that the acreage taxed in each jurisdiction for the previous year was correct unless evidence of change is furnished to or obtained by the various taxing agencies under rules and regulations adopted by those taxing agencies.

ARTICLE VII. PROPERTY AND WATER RIGHTS

This compact does not change:

(1) the title of any person or entity, public or private, to any of the lands adjacent to the Red River;

(2) the rights, including riparian rights, of any person or entity, public or private, that exist as a result of the person's or entity's title to lands adjacent to the Red River; or

(3) the boundaries of those lands.

ARTICLE VIII. EFFECTIVE DATE

This compact takes effect when enacted by the states of Texas and Oklahoma and consented to by the United States Congress.

ARTICLE IX. ENFORCEMENT

(a) This compact does not limit or prevent either party state from instituting or maintaining any action or proceeding, legal or equitable, in any court having jurisdiction, for the protection of any right under this compact or the enforcement of any of its provisions.

(b) This compact is not binding or obligatory on either party state unless and until it has been enacted by both states and consented to by the United States Congress. Notice of enactment of this compact by each state shall be given by the governor of that state to the governor of the other state and to the president of the United States. The president is requested to give notice to the governors of the party states of the consent to this compact by the United States Congress.

ARTICLE X. AMENDMENTS

This compact remains in full force and effect unless amended in the same manner as it was created.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999.

Sec. 12.003. NEGOTIATIONS TO RESOLVE DIFFERENCES. (a) Until the State of Oklahoma enters into the Red River Boundary Compact in substantially the form provided by Section 12.002, the Commissioner of the General Land Office has the authority to negotiate with the appropriate Oklahoma representative to resolve any differences between the states of Texas and Oklahoma regarding matters covered by the compact. The commissioner shall conduct the negotiations in cooperation with the Red River Boundary Commission created by H.C.R. No. 128, Acts of the 74th Legislature, Regular Session, 1995.

(b) The Commissioner of the General Land Office shall report annually to the governor of this state, or more frequently if necessary, on the status of the negotiations.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, if the boundary in the Texoma area, as described by Article II(b)(1), Red River Boundary Compact, Section 12.002, is not marked in accordance with Article II of the compact, the Red River Boundary Commission shall confer and act jointly with representatives appointed on behalf of the State of Oklahoma to redraw the boundary in the Texoma area in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 12.004. IMPLEMENTATION OF COMPACT. (a) If the State of Oklahoma enters into the Red River Boundary Compact in substantially the form provided by Section 12.002, the Commissioner of the General Land Office has the authority to negotiate with the appropriate Oklahoma representative to establish procedures for implementing the compact's provisions. The commissioner shall conduct the negotiations in cooperation with the Red River Boundary Commission.

(b) The Commissioner of the General Land Office shall report annually to the governor of this state, or more frequently if necessary, on the status of the negotiations.

(c) A procedure for implementing a provision of the compact must be approved by the governor of this state.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999.

Sec. 12.005. RELATION TO OTHER LAW AND LITIGATION. The Red River Boundary Compact does not affect:

(1) the Red River Compact, the text of which is set out in Section 46.013, Water Code; or

(2) the riparian rights of adjacent landowners to access and use the waters of the Red River as provided by the Treaty of Amity, Settlement and Limits, Feb. 22, 1819, United States-Spain, 8 Stat. 252, T.S. No. 327; or

(3) litigation pending in either state involving title to land or boundaries of rivers or water bodies of that state.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999.

For expiration of this subchapter, see Section 12.058.

SUBCHAPTER B. RED RIVER BOUNDARY COMMISSION

Sec. 12.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Red River Boundary Commission.

(2) "Texoma area" means the area defined by the Texoma Area Boundary Agreement.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 12.052. CREATION OF COMMISSION. The Red River Boundary Commission is established to oversee the redrawing of the boundary between this state and the State of Oklahoma in the Texoma area.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 12.053. MEMBERSHIP. (a) The commission is composed of five members appointed by the governor to represent:

(1) private property owners;

(2) local governments;

(3) state elected officials; and

(4) the general public.

(b) The governor shall designate one member as the presiding officer of the commission.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 12.054. COMPENSATION. A commission member is not entitled to receive compensation for service on the commission but may receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred while conducting commission business.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 12.055. STAFF SUPPORT. The General Land Office, the office of the attorney general, and the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality shall provide necessary staff support to the commission.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 12.056. POWERS AND DUTIES. The commission shall confer and act jointly with representatives appointed on behalf of the State of Oklahoma to:

(1) evaluate the methods, surveys, historical maps, and other information used to establish the boundary line between this state and the State of Oklahoma in the Texoma area;

(2) determine the location of the south bank of the Red River as the bank was located and marked by the United States Army Corps of Engineers before the beginning of construction of Lake Texoma, in accordance with Article II(c), Red River Boundary Compact, Section 12.002;

(3) redraw the boundary line between this state and the State of Oklahoma on any real property for which the United States Army Corps of Engineers granted an easement before August 31, 2000, to at least two districts or authorities created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, for the construction, operation, and maintenance of a water pipeline and related facilities in the Texoma area in order to negate any effects the boundary as it is currently drawn has on property interests associated with those easements in the Texoma area, in such a way that there is no net loss of property between either state so as to ensure that the redrawn boundary does not increase the political power or influence of either state, and in accordance with:

(A) the Lake Texoma preconstruction survey of the south bank of the Red River prepared by the United States Army Corps of Engineers; or

(B) other historical records or documentation of the United States Army Corps of Engineers identifying the location of the south bank of the Red River, if the survey described by Subdivision (3)(A) is unavailable;

(4) hold hearings and conferences in this state and in the State of Oklahoma as necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section; and

(5) take other action, alone or in cooperation with the State of Oklahoma or the United States, necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 94 (H.B. 908), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Sec. 12.057. REPORTS. (a) Not later than January 15, 2015, the commission shall report to the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and appropriate committees of the legislature the commission's findings and recommendations concerning joint action by this state and the State of Oklahoma regarding amendment of the Texoma Area Boundary Agreement to incorporate the boundary between this state and the State of Oklahoma in the Texoma area as redrawn.

(b) Not later than July 30, 2027, the commission shall issue a final report to the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and appropriate committees of the legislature.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 94 (H.B. 908), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (H.B. 641), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 220 (H.B. 374), Sec. 1, eff. June 4, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 184 (H.B. 1949), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 12.058. EXPIRATION OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter expires December 31, 2027.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 94 (H.B. 908), Sec. 3, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (H.B. 641), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 220 (H.B. 374), Sec. 2, eff. June 4, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 184 (H.B. 1949), Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 2023.